Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-489
Game birds released,
propagated, and taken; record; reports.

For the
purpose of sections 37-484 to 37-496, game birds shall be released upon licensed game breeding
and controlled shooting areas in numbers
regulated by the commission. The licensee shall keep
such records and make such reports as to game birds released, propagated,
and taken, at such times and in such manner as may be required by the commission.

Laws 1957, c. 152, § 6, p. 494;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-906;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 199;

Laws 2011, LB41, § 20.